Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§§ 51.1-100 through 51.1-124.
Repealed by Acts 1994, cc. 4, 85. For effective dates, see Editor’s note.

Cross references.

For present similar provisions, see Article 1.1 (§

51.1-124.2

et seq.), Article 2.1 (§

51.1-124.20

et seq.), and Article 3.1 (§

51.1-124.30

et seq.), which were all enacted by Acts 1994, cc. 4 and 85.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, cc. 4 and 85, repealed §§

51.1-100

through 51.1-124, which formerly comprised Articles 1, 2, and 3 of this chapter. The repeal of Articles 1 (§

51.1-100

et seq.) and 3 (§ 51.1-114 et seq.) was effective February 28, 1994; the repeal of Article 2 (§ 51.1-109 et seq.) was effective March 25, 1994.